Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202060-658.01
School crossing zone, defined.

School crossing zone means the area of a roadway designated to the public by the Department of Transportation or any county, city, or village as a school crossing zone through the use of a sign or traffic control device as specified by the department or any county, city, or village in conformity with the manual but does not include any area of a freeway. A school crossing zone starts at the location of the first sign or traffic control device identifying the school crossing zone and continues until a sign or traffic control device indicates that the school crossing zone has ended.

Laws 1997, LB 91, § 3;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 183.